Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1915
Foreclosure proceedings; proceeds of sale; disposition.

From the proceeds of the sale of any real property, the costs charged thereto shall first be paid. When the plaintiff is a private person, firm, or corporation, the balance thereof, or so much thereof as is necessary, shall be paid to the plaintiff. When the plaintiff is a governmental subdivision other than a land bank, or is a municipal corporation or drainage or irrigation district, the balance thereof, or so much thereof as is necessary, shall be paid to the county treasurer for distribution to the various governmental subdivisions, municipal corporations, or drainage or irrigation districts entitled thereto in discharge of all claims, excluding any lien on real estate for special assessments levied by any community improvement district or sanitary and improvement district which special assessments have not been previously offered for sale by the county treasurer. When the plaintiff is a land bank, the balance thereof, or so much thereof as is necessary, shall be paid to the land bank.

Laws 1943, c. 176, § 15, p. 618;

R.S.1943, § 77-1915;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 176;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 149;

Laws 2011, LB423, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB97, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 104.
April 17, 2026
Attorney's fee taxed as costs is not distributable as tax revenue. Strawn v. County of Sarpy, 156 Neb. 797, 58 N.W.2d 168 (1953).